Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1220.
do enact as follows:AB1220,11Section 1. 11.0101 (20) of the statutes is created to read:AB1220,2,6211.0101 (20) “Mass communication” means a message that is disseminated by 3means of one or more communications media, a mass electronic communication, a 4mass distribution, or a mass telephoning, but not including a bona fide poll 5conducted for the purpose of objectively identifying or collecting data concerning the 6attitudes or preferences of electors.AB1220,27Section 2. 11.0101 (20d) of the statutes is created to read:AB1220,2,9811.0101 (20d) “Mass distribution” means the distribution of 500 or more 9pieces of substantially identical material.AB1220,310Section 3. 11.0101 (20e) of the statutes is created to read:AB1220,3,3111.0101 (20e) “Mass electronic communication” means the transmission of 2500 or more pieces of substantially identical material by means of electronic mail or 3facsimile transmission.AB1220,44Section 4. 11.0101 (20f) of the statutes is created to read:AB1220,3,6511.0101 (20f) “Mass telephoning” means the making of 500 or more telephone 6calls conveying a substantially identical message.AB1220,57Section 5. 11.1203 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1220,3,9811.1203 (title) Coordination of expenditures for express advocacy; 9coordination of expenditures for mass communications.AB1220,610Section 6. 11.1203 (2) (a) (intro.) and 2. of the statutes are consolidated, 11renumbered 11.1203 (2) (a) and amended to read:AB1220,3,191211.1203 (2) (a) For purposes of this section sub. (1), an expenditure for express 13advocacy is coordinated if any of the following applies: 2. The the candidate, 14candidate’s agent, legislative campaign committee of the candidate’s political party, 15or the candidate’s political party exercises control over or engages in substantial 16discussions or negotiations with the political action committee, independent 17expenditure committee, other person, or individual making the expenditure or 18regarding the content, timing, location, form, intended audience, number, or 19frequency of the communication.AB1220,720Section 7. 11.1203 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is repealed.AB1220,821Section 8. 11.1203 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1220,3,232211.1203 (3) (intro.) None of the following are considered coordinated 23communications prohibited under this section sub. (1):AB1220,91Section 9. 11.1203 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB1220,4,12211.1203 (4) (a) No political action committee, independent expenditure 3committee, other person required to report under s. 11.1001, or individual may 4make an expenditure for a mass communication during the period beginning on the 560th day preceding an election and ending on the date of that election that includes 6a reference to a clearly identified candidate whose name is certified under s. 7.08 (2) 7(a) or 8.50 (1) (d) to appear on the ballot at that election and that is susceptible of no 8reasonable interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for the candidate or 9against an opponent of the candidate that is coordinated with the candidate, 10candidate’s committee, or candidate’s agent, nor with any legislative campaign 11committee of the candidate’s political party, or a political party, in violation of the 12contribution limits under s. 11.1101 or the source restrictions under s. 11.1112.AB1220,4,1913(b) An expenditure for a mass communication is coordinated if the candidate, 14candidate’s agent, legislative campaign committee of the candidate’s political party, 15or the candidate’s political party exercises control over, or engages in, substantial 16discussions or negotiations with the political action committee, independent 17expenditure committee, other person, or individual making the expenditure 18regarding the content, timing, location, form, intended audience, or frequency of the 19mass communication.AB1220,4,2120(c) If an expenditure for a mass communication is coordinated, but not in 21violation of the coordination prohibitions under par. (a), all of the following apply:AB1220,5,2221. The political action committee, independent expenditure committee, or 1other person making the expenditure shall report the expenditure as required 2under this chapter.AB1220,5,332. The candidate’s committee shall report the expenditure as a contribution.AB1220,5,44